Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 11.7
REGULATION OF FIREARMS

Law reviews:

For article, "In the

C

rosshairs:

C

olorado's New Gun Laws", see 33 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2004).

Section

29-11.7-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds that:

Section 3 of article II of the state constitution, the article referred to as the state bill of rights, declares that all persons have certain inalienable rights, which include the right to defend their lives and liberties;

Section 13 of article II of the state constitution protects the fundamental right of a person to keep and bear arms and implements section 3 of article II of the state constitution;

The general assembly recognizes a duty to protect and defend the fundamental civil rights set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (1);

The state has an interest in the regulation of firearms due to the ease of transporting firearms between local jurisdictions; and

Officials of local governments are uniquely equipped to make determinations as to regulations necessary in their local jurisdictions.

Repealed.

Based on the findings specified in subsection (1) of this section, the general assembly concludes that the regulation of firearms is a matter of state and local concern.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 652, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2021:

(1)(d), (1)(e), and (2) amended and (1)(f) and (1)(g) repealed, (SB 21-256), ch. 269, p. 1555, § 1, effective June 19.

29-11.7-101.5. Definitions.

As used in this article 11.7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Firearm component or accessory" means an item contained in, used in conjunction with, or mounted to a firearm.

"Local government" means a statutory or home rule city and county, county, city, or town.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-256), ch. 269, p. 1556, § 2, effective June 19.

29-11.7-102. Firearms database - prohibited.

A local government, including a law enforcement agency, shall not maintain a list or other form of record or database of:

Persons who purchase or exchange firearms or who leave firearms for repair or sale on consignment;

Persons who transfer firearms, unless the persons are federally licensed firearms dealers;

The descriptions, including serial numbers, of firearms purchased, transferred, exchanged, or left for repair or sale on consignment.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 653, § 2, effective March 18.

29-11.7-103. Local regulations governing firearms permitted.

Unless otherwise expressly prohibited pursuant to state law, a local government may enact an ordinance, regulation, or other law governing or prohibiting the sale, purchase, transfer, or possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component or accessory that a person may lawfully sell, purchase, transfer, or possess under state or federal law. The local ordinance, regulation, or other law may not impose a requirement on the sale, purchase, transfer, or possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component or accessory that is less restrictive than state law, and any less restrictive ordinance, regulation, or other law enacted by a local government before the effective date of this section, as amended in 2021, is void and unenforceable. A local ordinance, regulation, or other law governing the sale, purchase, transfer, or possession of a firearm, ammunition, or firearm component or accessory may only impose a criminal penalty for a violation upon a person who knew or reasonably should have known that the person's conduct was prohibited.

Nothing in this section requires the Colorado bureau of investigation to consider anything other than state or federal law in its background approval process and determinations.

Nothing in this section authorizes a local government to restrict the manufacture or sale of items pursuant to a United States military or law enforcement procurement contract.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 653, § 2, effective March 18.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-256), ch. 269, p. 1556, § 3, effective June 19.

29-11.7-104. Regulation - carrying - posting.

A local government may enact an ordinance, regulation, or other law that prohibits the open carrying of a firearm in a building or specific area within the local government's jurisdiction. If a local government enacts an ordinance, regulation, or other law that prohibits the open carrying of a firearm in a building or specific area, the local government shall post signs at the public entrances to the building or specific area informing persons that the open carrying of firearms is prohibited in the building or specific area.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added, p. 653, § 2, effective March 18.